Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2154
Authority; relocate individuals and businesses; replace housing units.

A redevelopment authority shall relocate or provide assistance in the relocation of individuals, families, and businesses occupying premises acquired for a redevelopment project pursuant to the procedures described in the Relocation Assistance Act. In the event any housing units are eliminated by a redevelopment project, the redevelopment plan for any such project shall include plans for equivalent replacement housing units elsewhere in the community.

Laws 1980, LB 986, § 4;

Laws 1989, LB 254, § 31.

Relocation Assistance Act, see section 76-1214.